sl-SI: Združljiv kovček za kitaro: Transportni kovček (flight/road case); Mehka torba (gig bag); Trd kovček; Oblikovan kovček; Univerzalno; Drugo
it: Custodia per chitarra compatibile: Flight case/Road case; Gig bag; Custodia rigida; Custodia sagomata; Universale; Altro
nl: Compatibele gitaarcase: Flightcase/roadcase; Gigbag; Koffer; Voorgevormde koffer; Universeel; Overig
ro-RO: Carcasă de chitară compatibilă: Toc flight/road; Husă; Toc rigid; Toc profilat; Universal; Altele
fr: Étui de guitare compatible: Flight case/road case; Housse; Étui rigide; Étui moulé; Universel; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместим калъф за китара: Транспортен куфар; Мек калъф; Твърд куфар; Формован куфар; Универсален; Друго
es: Tipo de estuche para guitarra compatible: Estuche de viaje/gira; Funda; Estuche rígido; Estuche moldeado; Universal; Otro
tr: Uyumlu gitar kutusu: Uçuş/turne kutusu; Taşıma çantası; Sert kutu; Kalıplı kutu; Evrensel; Diğer
zh-TW: 相容的吉他琴盒: 航空/公路硬盒; 琴袋; 硬盒; 塑模硬盒; 通用; 其他
ru: Совместимый гитарный кейс: Флайт-кейс / дорожный кейс; Мягкий чехол; Жесткий кейс; Формованный кейс; Универсальный; Другое
nb: Kompatibel gitar-eske: Flight-/roadcase; Gigbag; Hardcase; Formstøpt etui; Universell; Annet
pt-PT: Caixa de guitarra compatível: Estojo de voo/estrada; Saco de transporte; Estojo rígido; Estojo moldado; Universal; Outro
zh-CN: 适配吉他琴箱类型: 航空箱/演出箱; 琴包; 硬盒; 模压盒; 通用; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva kitarakotelo: Kuljetuskotelo / flight case; Gig bag; Kova kotelo; Muotoiltu kotelo; Yleinen; Muu
ja: 互換性のあるギターケース: フライト/ロードケース; ギグバッグ; ハードケース; モールドケース; ユニバーサル; その他
hu: Kompatibilis gitártok: Flight/road tok; Puhatok; Keménytok; Öntött tok; Univerzális; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estojo de guitarra compatível: Case de voo/turnê; Gig bag; Hard case; Case moldado; Universal; Outro
ko: 호환 기타 케이스: 플라이트/로드 케이스; 긱 백; 하드 케이스; 몰딩 케이스; 범용; 기타
vi: Hộp đựng đàn guitar tương thích: Hộp cứng bảo vệ (Flight/road); Bao mềm; Hộp cứng; Hộp đúc khuôn; Phổ thông; Khác
th: เคสกีตาร์ที่ใช้งานด้วยได้: เคส Flight/Road; กระเป๋า Gig Bag; ฮาร์ดเคส; เคสเข้ารูป; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
de: Kompatibles Gitarrencase: Flight-/Roadcase; Gigbag; Hartschalenkoffer; Formkoffer; Universal; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní kytarové pouzdro: Přepravní kufr (Flight/road case); Gig bag; Pevné pouzdro; Tvarované pouzdro; Univerzální; Jiné
en: Compatible guitar case: Flight/road case; Gig bag; Hard case; Molded case; Universal; Other
el: Συμβατή θήκη κιθάρας: Θήκη flight/road; Gig bag; Σκληρή θήκη; Θήκη molded; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kompatibilné puzdro na gitaru: Prepravný kufor (flight/road case); Gig bag; Pevné puzdro; Tvarované puzdro; Univerzálne; Iné
pl: Kompatybilny futerał gitarowy: Skrzynia transportowa (flight/road case); Pokrowiec miękki (gig bag); Twardy futerał; Futerał profilowany; Uniwersalny; Inne
da: Kompatibelt guitarkasse: Flight-/roadcase; Gigbag; Hardcase; Formstøbt kasse; Universel; Andet
lt-LT: Suderinamas gitaros dėklas: Skrydžio / kelioninis dėklas; Minkštas dėklas; Kietas dėklas; Formuotas dėklas; Universalus; Kita
hr-HR: Kompatibilna kutija za gitaru: Prijenosni kofer (flight/road kofer); Mekana torba (gig bag); Tvrdi kofer; Oblikovani kofer; Univerzalno; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibla gitarrfodral: Flightcase/turnécase; Gigbag; Hårt fodral; Gjutet fodral; Universell; Övrigt